District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

47-1534

Violations; penalties; prosecutions.

Repealed.

History

Feb. 28, 1987, D.C. Law 6-212, § 15, 34 DCR 850
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Oct. 4, 2000, D.C. Law 13-204, § 2(c), 47 DCR 5799

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-1534.